Utah statutes.
10-8-84.   Ordinances, rules, and regulations -- Passage -- Penalties.
(1)  The municipal legislative body may pass all ordinances and rules, and
make all regulations, not repugnant to law, necessary for carrying into effect
or discharging all powers and duties conferred by this chapter, and as are
necessary and proper to provide for the safety and preserve the health, and
promote the prosperity, improve the morals, peace and good order, comfort, and
convenience of the city and its inhabitants, and for the protection of
property in the city.
(2)  The municipal legislative body may enforce obedience to the ordinances
with fines or penalties in accordance with Section 10-3-703.
